src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
CHECKME, should there be +Comp and +Superl

CHECKME, should there be +Comp and +Superl












* +Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e  POST-V_01 ;  works with ackern







* LEXICON V_haben__vbhaver  haben:ha



* LEXICON V_/müssen__vbmod  müssen:muss


* LEXICON V_/dürfen__vbmod  dürfen:darf


* LEXICON V_/können__vbmod  können:konn


* LEXICON V_/mögen__vbmod  mögen:mog


* LEXICON V_/sollen__vbmod  sollen:soll



* LEXICON V_/werden__vaux  werden:w


* LEXICON V_/wollen__vaux  wollen:w




* LEXICON V_/werden__vblex  werden:w


* LEXICON V_/kommen__vblex  kommen:k


* LEXICON V_g/eben__vblex  geben:gab


* LEXICON V_spr/echen__vblex  geben:gab


* LEXICON V_g/elten__vblex  gelten:galt


* LEXICON V_tr/eten__vblex  treten:tratt


* LEXICON V_g/ehen__vblex  gehen:g


* LEXICON V_st/ehen__vblex  stehen:st


* LEXICON V_s/ehen__vblex  sehen:sah

* LEXICON V_schr/ecken__vblex  schrecken:schrack


* LEXICON V_w/erfen__vblex  werfen:warf

* LEXICON V_b/ersten__vblex  bersten:barst
birst

* LEXICON V_k/ennen__vblex  kennen:kann

* LEXICON V_s/enden__vblex  senden:sand


* LEXICON V_/nehmen__vblex  nehmen:n


* LEXICON V_dr/eschen__vblex  dreschen:drosch


* LEXICON V_/laufen__vblex  laufen:l


* LEXICON V_h/alten__vblex  halten:halt


* LEXICON V_l/assen__vblex  lassen:l


* LEXICON V_st/oßen__vblex  stoßen:stoß


* LEXICON V_bl/eiben__vblex  bleiben:bleib


* LEXICON V_r/eißen__vblex  reißen:reiss


* LEXICON V_gl/eichen__vblex  gleichen:gleich


* LEXICON V_schw/immen__vblex  schwimmen:schwamm


* LEXICON V_br/ingen__vblex  bringen:br


* LEXICON V_d/ingen__vblex  dingen:dang


* LEXICON V_f/inden__vblex  finden:fand


* LEXICON V_s/itzen__vblex  sitzen:s


* LEXICON V_d/enken__vblex  denken:d


* LEXICON V_bew/egen__vblex  bewegen:bew


* LEXICON V_pfl/egen__vblex  pflegen:pfl

* LEXICON V_z/iehen__vblex  ziehen:z


* LEXICON V_fr/ieren__vblex  frieren:fror


* LEXICON V_sch/ießen__vblex  schießen:schoss


* LEXICON V_f/ahren__vblex  fahren:fahr


* LEXICON V_f/angen__vblex  fangen:fang


* LEXICON V_/dürfen__vblex  dürfen:darf

* LEXICON V_l/iegen__vblex  liegen:lag













* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-deu/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
